inc/flattened/excel2fst/ojibwe-templ.xfst
! There are flags at morpheme boundaries.
set flag-is-epsilon ON

define Sigma [ a | b | c | d | e | g | h | i | k | m | n | o | s | t | w | y | z ] ;
define Cons [ b | c | d | g | h | k | m | n | s | t | w | y | z ] ;
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o ] ;

define dDeletion d -> 0 || _ ">>" Cons ;

define amRule1 m -> a || a _ ">>" [m|n] ;

define amRule2 m -> n || a _ ">>" [z|g] ;

define nDeletion n -> 0 || [ i | o o ] _ ">>" Cons ;

define vowelDeletion [ Vowel - e ] -> 0 || Cons _ ">>" .#. ;

define wDeletion w -> 0 || _ (">>") .#. ;

! Sources:
! https://ojibwe.lib.umn.edu/main-entry/g-pf
! https://ojibwe.lib.umn.edu/main-entry/g-pf
! https://ojibwegrammar.langsci.wisc.edu/Assets/Pdfs/InflAnishPersonPrefixes1.02.pdf
define PrefixDInsertion [..] -> d || [i|o] _ "<<" Vowel ;
define PrefixOLengthening o -> {oo} || [i|o] d "<<" _ ; 

define cleanUp ["<<"|">>"] -> 0 ; 

read lexc VII.lexc
define VIILexicon ;

read lexc VAI.lexc
define VAILexicon ;

read lexc VTI.lexc
define VTILexicon ;

read lexc lexc_source/verb_prefixes.lexc
define VPrefixes ;
read regex "<<" VPrefixes ;
define Prefixes ;

regex [ VIILexicon |
        VAILexicon |
	VTILexicon ] ;
substitute defined Prefixes for "<<"
define Lexicon ;

read regex Lexicon .o. [ dDeletion .o.
     	   	         amRule1 .o.
     	   	         amRule2 .o.
			 vowelDeletion .o.
			 wDeletion .o.
			 nDeletion .o.
			 PrefixDInsertion .o.
			 PrefixOLengthening .o.
     	   	         cleanUp ] ;
define Analyzer

! Closed classes
read lexc lexc_source/numerals.lexc
define Numerals ;

read lexc lexc_source/particles.lexc
define Particles ;

read lexc lexc_source/adverbs.lexc
define Adverbs ;

read lexc lexc_source/quantifiers.lexc
define Quantifiers ;

read lexc lexc_source/pronouns.lexc
define Pronouns ;

read regex [ Lexicon |
             Numerals |
	     Particles |
	     Adverbs |
	     Quantifiers |
	     Pronouns ] ;
	     
save stack ojibwe.fomabin
